Missouri, session 2026, SB1359.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 537.323, to read as
follows:
537.323. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Biometric identifier", a retina or iris scan,
fingerprint, voiceprint, or scan of hand or face geometry.
The term "biometric identifier" shall not include the
following:
(a) Any writing sample, written signature, photograph,
human biological sample used for valid scientific testing or
screening, demographic data, tattoo descriptions, or
physical descriptions such as height, weight, hair color, or
eye color;
(b) Any anatomical gift, tissue, or part, as such
terms are defined in section 194.210, or any blood or serum
stored on behalf of recipients or potential recipients of
living or cadaveric transplants and obtained or stored by a
federally designated organ procurement organization;
(c) Biometric data used in genetic testing, including
any direct-to-consumer genetic testing, as such term is
defined in 45 CFR 160.103;

SB 1359 2
(d) Information captured from a patient in a health
care setting or information collected, used, or stored for
health care treatment, payment, or operations under the
federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
of 1996 (HIPAA), P.L. 104-191, as amended; or
(e) Any X-ray, roentgen process, computed tomography,
MRI, PET scan, mammography, or other image or film of the
human anatomy used to diagnose, prognose, or treat an
illness or other medical condition or to further validate
scientific testing or screening;
(2) "Biometric information", any information,
regardless of how it is captured, converted, stored, or
shared, based on an individual's biometric identifier used
to identify an individual. The term "biometric information"
shall not include information derived from items or
procedures provided in paragraphs (a) to (e) of subdivision
(1) of this subsection;
(3) "Confidential and sensitive information", personal
information that can be used to uniquely identify an
individual or an individual's account or property. The term
"confidential and sensitive information" includes, but is
not limited to, a genetic marker, genetic testing
information, a unique identifier number to locate an account
or property, an account number, a PIN number, a passcode, a
driver's license number, or a Social Security number;
(4) "Private entity", any individual, partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, or association. The
term "private entity" shall not include a state or local
government agency, or any employee or agent thereof, or a
court of this state, or any clerk, judge, or justice thereof.
2. Except as provided in subsection 4 of this section,
a private entity in possession of biometric identifiers or

SB 1359 3
biometric information shall not be liable for damages for
the unauthorized or negligent disclosure of biometric
identifiers or biometric information if the private entity:
(1) Posts and maintains signs or notices which contain
the warning as specified in subsection 3 of this section;
(2) Informs the public and the individual whose
biometric identifier or biometric information is being
collected, captured, or otherwise obtained of the specific
purpose for which the biometric identifier or biometric
information is being used;
(3) Develops a written policy, made available to the
public, establishing a retention schedule and guidelines for
permanently destroying biometric identifiers and biometric
information when the initial purpose for collecting or
obtaining such biometric identifiers or biometric
information has been satisfied or within three years of the
individual's last interaction with the private entity,
whichever occurs first;
(4) Complies with the written policy described in
subdivision (3) of this subsection absent a valid warrant or
subpoena issued by a court of competent jurisdiction; and
(5) Stores, transmits, and protects from disclosure
all biometric identifiers and biometric information in a
manner that is the same as or more protective than the
manner in which the private entity stores, transmits, and
protects other confidential and sensitive information.
3. Every private entity collecting biometric
identifiers shall place a notice in a clearly visible
location or if in a written agreement or contract, in
clearly readable print, stating the following warning:

SB 1359 4
WARNING
This entity obtains biometric identifiers or
biometric information and complies with the
collection and retention requirements under
Missouri law. This entity shall not be liable
for damages for the unauthorized or negligent
disclosure of such identifiers or information.
Information about this entity's collection and
retention schedule is made available to the
public.
4. The provisions of this section shall not be
construed to:
(1) Impact the admission or discovery of biometric
identifiers and biometric information in any action in any
court, or before any tribunal, board, or agency;
(2) Conflict with the provisions of section 334.097,
the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996 (HIPAA), P.L. 104-191, as amended, and any rules
100 promulgated thereunder;
101 (3) Conflict with the provisions of sections 324.1100
102 to 324.1148 and any rules promulgated thereunder;
103 (4) Apply in any manner to a financial institution or
104 an affiliate of a financial institution that is subject to
105 Title V of the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act of 1999, P.L.
106 106-102, and any rules promulgated thereunder; or
107 (5) Create or increase the liability of a private
108 entity and does not affect the availability of any other
109 immunities from or defenses to liability established by law
110 or available under common law to which a private entity may
111 be entitled.
✓